Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 1. Prohibited Practices Generally.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4C M.J. Constitutional Law, § 94; 10A M.J. Instructions, § 36.10B M.J. Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 28, 33 - 36, 38, 41 - 44, 46, 48.

§ 4.1-300.
Illegal manufacture and bottling; penalty.

Except as otherwise provided in §§

4.1-200

and

4.1-201

, no person shall manufacture alcoholic beverages in the Commonwealth without being licensed under this subtitle to manufacture such alcoholic beverages. Nor shall any person, other than a brewery licensee or bottler’s licensee, bottle beer for sale.

The presence of mash at an unlicensed distillery shall constitute manufacturing within the meaning of this section.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 6 felony.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-57; 1954, c. 484; 1974, c. 460; 1993, c. 866.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 4.1-301.
Conspiracy to violate § 4.1-300; penalty.

If two or more persons conspire together to do any act which is in violation of §

4.1-300

, and one or more of these persons does any act to effect the object of the conspiracy, each of the parties to such conspiracy shall be guilty of a Class 6 felony.

History.

1956, c. 70, § 4-57.1; 1993, c. 866.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 4.1-302.
Illegal sale of alcoholic beverages in general; penalty.

If any person who is not licensed sells any alcoholic beverages except as permitted by this subtitle, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

In the event of a second or subsequent conviction under this section, a jail sentence of no less than thirty days shall be imposed and in no case be suspended.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-58; 1952, c. 491; 1984, c. 603; 1993, c. 866.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 4.1-302.1.
Use of alcohol vaporizing devices prohibited; penalty.

No person shall purchase, offer for sale or use, sell or use any vaporized form of an alcoholic beverage produced by an alcohol vaporizing device.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

2006, c. 714.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 4.1-302.2.
Sale, purchase, use of powdered or crystalline alcohol prohibited; penalty.

No person shall purchase or possess, offer for sale or use, sell, or use any powdered or crystalline alcohol product.

As used in this section, “powdered or crystalline alcohol” means a product that is manufactured into a powdered or crystalline form and that contains any amount of alcohol.

A violation of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

2015, cc. 25, 735.

Effective date.

This section is effective April 15, 2015, by emergency pursuant to Acts 2015, c. 735, cl. 2.

§ 4.1-303.
Purchase of alcoholic beverages from person not authorized to sell; penalty.

If any person buys alcoholic beverages from any person other than the Board, a government store or a person authorized under this subtitle to sell alcoholic beverages, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-71; 1968, c. 7; 1993, c. 866.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 4.1-304.
Persons to whom alcoholic beverages may not be sold; proof of legal age; penalty.

No person shall, except pursuant to subdivisions 1 through 5 of §

4.1-200

, sell any alcoholic beverages to any individual when at the time of such sale he knows or has reason to believe that the individual to whom the sale is made is (i) less than 21 years of age, (ii) interdicted, or (iii) intoxicated. Any person convicted of a violation of this subsection is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Any person who sells, except pursuant to subdivisions 1 through 5 of §

4.1-200

, any alcoholic beverage to an individual who is less than 21 years of age and at the time of the sale does not require the individual to present bona fide evidence of legal age indicating that the individual is 21 years of age or older is guilty of a violation of this subsection. Bona fide evidence of legal age is limited to any evidence that is or reasonably appears to be an unexpired driver’s license issued by any state of the United States or the District of Columbia, military identification card, United States passport or foreign government visa, unexpired special identification card issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, or any other valid government-issued identification card bearing the individual’s photograph, signature, height, weight, and date of birth, or which bears a photograph that reasonably appears to match the appearance of the purchaser. A student identification card shall not constitute bona fide evidence of legal age for purposes of this subsection. Any person convicted of a violation of this subsection is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor. Notwithstanding the provisions of §

4.1-202

, the Board shall not take administrative action against a licensee for the conduct of his employee who violates this subsection.

No person shall be convicted of both subsections A and B for the same sale.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-62; 1970, c. 686; 1974, c. 460; 1979, c. 537; 1981, c. 24; 1982, c. 66; 1983, c. 608; 1985, c. 559; 1990, c. 771; 1993, c. 866; 2013, c. 562.

Cross references.

As to punishment for misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

As to penalty for fraudulent use of driver’s license or Department of Motor Vehicles identification card to obtain alcoholic beverages, see §

46.2-347

.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 562 added the subsection A designator, and in subsection A, substituted “individual” for “person” twice, added the last sentence and made a minor stylistic change; designated the former second paragraph as subsection B and rewrote it; and added subsection C.

Law Review.

For comment on Virginia’s dramshop immunity, see 10 G.M.U. L. Rev. 285 (1988).

§ 4.1-305.
Purchasing or possessing alcoholic beverages unlawful in certain cases; venue; exceptions; penalty; forfeiture; deferred proceedings; treatment and education programs and services.

No person to whom an alcoholic beverage may not lawfully be sold under §

4.1-304

shall consume, purchase or possess, or attempt to consume, purchase or possess, any alcoholic beverage, except (i) pursuant to subdivisions 1 through 7 of §

4.1-200

; (ii) where possession of the alcoholic beverages by a person less than 21 years of age is due to such person’s making a delivery of alcoholic beverages in pursuance of his employment or an order of his parent; or (iii) by any state, federal, or local law-enforcement officer or his agent when possession of an alcoholic beverage is necessary in the performance of his duties. Such person may be prosecuted either in the county or city in which the alcohol was possessed or consumed, or in the county or city in which the person exhibits evidence of physical indicia of consumption of alcohol. It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge of a violation of this subsection if the defendant shows that such consumption or possession was pursuant to subdivision 7 of §

4.1-200

.

No person under the age of 21 years shall use or attempt to use any (i) altered, fictitious, facsimile, or simulated license to operate a motor vehicle; (ii) altered, fictitious, facsimile, or simulated document, including but not limited to a birth certificate or student identification card; or (iii) motor vehicle driver’s license or other document issued under Chapter 3 (§

46.2-300

et seq.) of Title 46.2 or the comparable law of another jurisdiction, birth certificate, or student identification card of another person in order to establish a false identification or false age for himself to consume, purchase, or attempt to consume or purchase an alcoholic beverage.

Any person found guilty of a violation of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor, and upon conviction (i) such person shall be ordered to pay a mandatory minimum fine of $500 or ordered to perform a mandatory minimum of 50 hours of community service as a condition of probation supervision and (ii) the license to operate a motor vehicle in the Commonwealth of any such person age 18 or older shall be suspended for a period of not less than six months and not more than one year; the license to operate a motor vehicle in the Commonwealth of any juvenile shall be handled in accordance with the provisions of § 16.1-278.9. The court, in its discretion and upon a demonstration of hardship, may authorize an adult convicted of a violation of this section the use of a restricted license to operate a motor vehicle in accordance with the provisions of subsection E of §

18.2-271.1

or when referred to a local community-based probation services agency established pursuant to Article 9 (§

9.1-173

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 9.1. During the period of license suspension, the court may require an adult who is issued a restricted license under the provisions of this subsection to be (a) monitored by an alcohol safety action program or (b) supervised by a local community-based probation services agency established pursuant to Article 9 (§

9.1-173

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 9.1, if one has been established for the locality. The alcohol safety action program or local community-based probation services agency shall report to the court any violation of the terms of the restricted license, the required alcohol safety action program monitoring or local community-based probation services and any condition related thereto or any failure to remain alcohol-free during the suspension period.

Any alcoholic beverage purchased or possessed in violation of this section shall be deemed contraband and forfeited to the Commonwealth in accordance with §

4.1-338

.

Any retail licensee who in good faith promptly notifies the Board or any state or local law-enforcement agency of a violation or suspected violation of this section shall be accorded immunity from an administrative penalty for a violation of §

4.1-304

.

When any adult who has not previously been convicted of underaged consumption, purchase or possession of alcoholic beverages in Virginia or any other state or the United States is before the court, the court may, upon entry of a plea of guilty or not guilty, if the facts found by the court would justify a finding of guilt of a violation of subsection A, without entering a judgment of guilt and with the consent of the accused, defer further proceedings and place him on probation subject to appropriate conditions. Such conditions may include the imposition of the license suspension and restricted license provisions in subsection C. However, in all such deferred proceedings, the court shall require the accused to enter a treatment or education program or both, if available, that in the opinion of the court best suits the needs of the accused. If the accused is placed on local community-based probation, the program or services shall be located in any of the judicial districts served by the local community-based probation services agency or in any judicial district ordered by the court when the placement is with an alcohol safety action program. The services shall be provided by (i) a program licensed by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, (ii) certified by the Commission on VASAP, or (iii) by a program or services made available through a community-based probation services agency established pursuant to Article 9 (§

9.1-173

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 9.1, if one has been established for the locality. When an offender is ordered to a local community-based probation services rather than the alcohol safety action program, the local community-based probation services agency shall be responsible for providing for services or referring the offender to education or treatment services as a condition of probation.Upon violation of a condition, the court may enter an adjudication of guilt and proceed as otherwise provided. Upon fulfillment of the conditions, the court shall discharge the person and dismiss the proceedings against him without an adjudication of guilt. A discharge and dismissal hereunder shall be treated as a conviction for the purpose of applying this section in any subsequent proceedings.When any juvenile is found to have committed a violation of subsection A, the disposition of the case shall be handled according to the provisions of Article 9 (§ 16.1-278 et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 16.1.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-62; 1970, c. 686; 1974, c. 460; 1979, c. 537; 1981, c. 24; 1982, c. 66; 1983, c. 608; 1985, c. 559; 1990, c. 771; 1993, c. 866; 1995, c. 374; 1996, cc. 626, 730; 2000, c. 325; 2002, c. 338; 2003, cc. 845, 849; 2004, cc. 322, 461; 2005, c. 895; 2006, c. 207; 2007, c. 133; 2009, cc. 248, 726, 813, 840; 2012, cc. 250, 260; 2020, cc. 1227, 1246.

Cross references.

As to court fees for a deferral of proceedings pursuant to §

4.1-305

, see § 16.1-69.48:1. As to fixed court fee for felony reduced to misdemeanor, see §

17.1-275.2

, and for fixed misdemeanor fee, see §

17.1-275.7

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

As to automatic sealing of criminal history record information for offenses resulting in a deferred and dismissed disposition or conviction, see §

19.2-392.6

.

As to penalty for fraudulent use of a driver’s license in order to obtain alcoholic beverages, see §

46.2-347

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1227 and
1246, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1227 and
1246, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 325 inserted the present third and fourth sentences of subsection C.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 338 added subsection F.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 845, in subsection A, substituted “21” for “twenty-one” in clause (ii) in the first sentence and added the last sentence; and substituted “50” for “fifty” in clause (i) in the first sentence of subsection C.

The 2003 amendment by c. 849, in subsections A and B, substituted “21” for “twenty-one”; in subsection C, substituted “50” for “fifty” and inserted “as a condition of probation supervision” in the first sentence, inserted “or when referred to a local community-based probation program established pursuant to Article 9 (§

9.1-173

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 9.1” in the second sentence, added “During the period of license suspension” at the beginning of the third sentence, and deleted “during the period of license suspension” at the end of that sentence; and in subsection F, substituted the present fourth and fifth sentences for the former fourth sentence, which read: “This program may be located in any judicial district ordered by the court but shall be licensed by the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services or certified by the Commission on VASAP,” and added the last sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 322, in subsection C, inserted clause (ii) in the third sentence and, in the fourth sentence, inserted “or local community-based probation program” and “the required alcohol . . . probation and”; and in subsection F, substituted “underaged” for “under-aged” in the first sentence, rewrote the fourth sentence, and added “if one has been established for the locality” at the end of the fifth sentence.

The 2004 amendment by c. 461, in subsection C, substituted “mandatory minimum fine of $500” for “fine of at least $500” and inserted “mandatory” in the first sentence and deleted the last sentence, which read: “However, the sentence imposed pursuant to clause (i) of this subsection shall not be suspended”; and substituted “underaged” for “under-aged” in the first sentence of subsection F.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 895, in subsection A, inserted “consume” preceding “purchase” two times; in subsection B, inserted “consume” preceding “purchase,” and “consume or” preceding “purchase”; and inserted “consumption, purchase or” in the first sentence of subsection F.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 207, in the first sentence of subsection C, substituted “(ii) the license” for “(ii) such person’s license,” substituted “Commonwealth of any such person age 18 or older shall be” for “Commonwealth may be” and inserted “not less than six months and.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 133, throughout subsections C and F, substituted “community-based probation services agency” for “community-based probation program”; substituted “local community-based probation services” for “the local community-based probation” in the last sentence of subsection C; and in subsection F, inserted “or services” in two places, inserted “local”
following “served by the” in the fourth sentence, substituted “Article 9 (§

9.1-173

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 9.1” for “§

9.1-174

” in clause (iii) of the fifth sentence and in the last sentence, deleted “enter” following “ordered to” and substituted “community-based probation services” for “community-based probation program.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 248 added the last sentence in subsection A; and redesignated former clauses (i) and (ii) designations as clauses (a) and (b) designations in the next-to-last sentence of subsection C.

The 2009 amendment by c. 726, in subsection C, inserted “the license to operate a motor vehicle in the Commonwealth of any juvenile shall be handled in accordance with the provisions of § 16.1-278.9” at the end of the first sentence; in the second sentence, substituted “an adult” for “any person” and deleted “subsection D of § 16.1-278.9 or” preceding “subsection E of”; and in the third sentence, substituted “an adult who is” for “a person”; in subsection F, substituted “adult” for “person” near the beginning; and added the last paragraph.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical and substituted “Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” in clause (i) of subsection F.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 250 and 260 are identical, and inserted “or his agent” following “local law-enforcement officer” in clause (iii) of the first sentence in subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1227 and 1246 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and substituted “driver’s license or other document issued under Chapter 3 (§

46.2-300

et seq.) of Title 46.2 or the comparable law of another jurisdiction” for “operator’s license” in clause (iii) of subsection B; in subsection C, substituted “restricted license” for “restricted permit” in the second through fourth sentences; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article summarizing published Virginia criminal law decisions between July 1, 2002 and July 1, 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 87 (2003).

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

§ 4.1-306.
Purchasing alcoholic beverages for one to whom they may not be sold; penalty; forfeiture.

Any person who purchases alcoholic beverages for another person, and at the time of such purchase knows or has reason to believe that the person for whom the alcoholic beverage was purchased was (i) interdicted, or (ii) intoxicated, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

In addition to any other penalty authorized by law, any person found guilty of a violation of this section shall have his license to operate a motor vehicle suspended for a period of not more than one year. The court, in its discretion, may authorize any person convicted of a violation of this section the use of a restricted permit to operate a motor vehicle in accordance with the provisions of subsection D of § 16.1-278.9 or subsection E of §

18.2-271.1

.

Any alcoholic beverages purchased in violation of this section shall be deemed contraband and forfeited to the Commonwealth in accordance with §

4.1-338

.

A1.

Any person who purchases for, or otherwise gives, provides, or assists in the provision of alcoholic beverages to another person, when he knows or has reason to know that such person was less than 21 years of age, except (i) pursuant to subdivisions 1 through 7 of §

4.1-200

; (ii) where possession of the alcoholic beverages by a person less than 21 years of age is due to such person’s making a delivery of alcoholic beverages in pursuance of his employment or an order of his parent; or (iii) by any state, federal, or local law-enforcement officer when possession of an alcoholic beverage is necessary in the performance of his duties, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-73; 1970, c. 686; 1993, c. 866; 2005, cc. 895, 898; 2006, c. 87; 2011, c. 31.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 895, in subsection A, substituted “Any person who” for “If any person” and deleted clause (i), which read “less than twenty-one years of age” and redesignated clauses (ii) and (iii) as clauses (i) and (ii), substituted “is” for “he shall be” in clause (ii); and inserted subdivision A 1.

The 2005 amendment by c. 898 inserted present subsection B and redesignated former subsection B as present subsection C.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 87 substituted “shall” for “may” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 31 substituted “when he knows or has reason to know that such person was less than 21 years of age” for “knowing that such person was less than 21 years of age” in subsection A1.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Civil liability. —

Student did not sufficiently allege that the fraternity members could be held liable for negligence per se under this section because the Virginia Supreme Court had previously found that a violation of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act, of which this section fell within, did not give rise to civil liability. Liberati v. Andress, 2021 Va. Cir. LEXIS 120 (Radford Apr. 23, 2021).

§ 4.1-307.
Persons by whom alcoholic beverages may not be sold or served for on-premises consumption; penalty.

No person shall permit anyone employed by him under the age of (i) eighteen years to sell, serve or dispense in any manner alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption, except pursuant to subdivisions 1 through 5 of §

4.1-200

or (ii) twenty-one years to prepare or mix alcoholic beverages in the capacity of bartender.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-63; 1974, c. 460; 1982, c. 66; 1983, c. 608; 1993, c. 866.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 4.1-308.
Drinking alcoholic beverages, or offering to another, in public place; penalty; exceptions.

If any person takes a drink of alcoholic beverages or offers a drink thereof to another, whether accepted or not, at or in any public place, he is guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor.

This section shall not prevent any person from drinking alcoholic beverages or offering a drink thereof to another in any rooms or areas approved by the Board in a licensed establishment, provided such establishment or the person who operates the same is licensed to sell alcoholic beverages at retail for on-premises consumption and the alcoholic beverages drunk or offered were purchased therein.

This section shall not prevent any person from drinking alcoholic beverages or offering a drink thereof to another in any room or area approved by the Board at an event for which a banquet license, mixed beverage special events license, or designated outdoor refreshment area license has been granted. Nor shall this section prevent, upon authorization of the licensee, any person from drinking his own lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages or offering a drink thereof to another in approved areas and locations at events for which a coliseum or stadium license has been granted.

This section shall not prevent any person from drinking alcoholic beverages or offering a drink thereof to another on a chartered boat being used for the transportation of passengers for compensation which is not licensed by the Board and which does not sell alcoholic beverages.

This section shall not prevent any person from drinking alcoholic beverages or offering a drink thereof to another in any areas approved by the Board in a licensed commercial lifestyle center.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-78; 1956, c. 23; 1972, c. 143; 1977, c. 439; 1979, c. 622; 1986, c. 113; 1988, c. 893; 1989, c. 42; 1990, c. 932; 1993, c. 866; 2017, cc. 157, 492; 2019, c. 622; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 390, 391.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Drunkenness, § 13.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 157 and 492 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “is guilty” for “shall be guilty”; and added subsection E.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 622 inserted “or local special events license” in subsection C and made related changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 390 and 391, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “designated outdoor refreshment area” for “local special events” in subsection C.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Reasonable suspicion. —

Police officers possessed a reasonable suspicion to stop a riding mower because defendant operated the riding lawn-mower on a highway while holding an alcoholic libation. Commonwealth v. Taylor, 2019 Va. Cir. LEXIS 201 (Greene County May 29, 2019).

Officer possessed a reasonable suspicion to stop the riding lawn mower because defendant operated it on a curve in the roadway of the subdivision, which roadways were highways for law enforcement purposes, while holding a beer in violation of statute, the riding mower lacked required flagging on the back, defendant failed to drive to the right side of the highway as required, and reasonable suspicion existed to believe that he littered by discarding beer cans on private property. Commonwealth v. Taylor, 102 Va. Cir. 190, 2019 Va. Cir. LEXIS 1198 (Greene County May 29, 2019).

§ 4.1-309.
Drinking or possessing alcoholic beverages in or on public school grounds; penalty.

No person shall possess or drink any alcoholic beverage in or upon the grounds of any public elementary or secondary school during school hours or school or student activities.

In addition, no person shall drink and no organization shall serve any alcoholic beverage in or upon the grounds of any public elementary or secondary school after school hours or school or student activities, except for religious congregations using wine for sacramental purposes only.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

This section shall not prohibit any person from possessing or drinking alcoholic beverages or any organization from serving alcoholic beverages in areas approved by the Board at a performing arts center owned by the City of Alexandria or the City of Portsmouth, provided the organization operating the performing arts center or its lessee has a license granted by the Board.

History.

1954, c. 651, § 4-78.1; 1982, c. 288; 1991, c. 710; 1993, c. 866; 1994, c. 844; 1997, cc. 784, 837; 2007, c. 813.

Cross references.

As to loss of driving privileges for alcohol offenses by delinquent children, see § 16.1-278.9.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813, substituted “the City of Alexandria or the City of Portsmouth” for “any city having a population between 100,000 and 105,000” in subsection D.

§ 4.1-309.1.
Possessing or consuming alcoholic beverage while operating a school bus; penalty.

Any person who possesses or consumes an alcoholic beverage while operating a school bus and transporting children is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. For purposes of this section, “school bus” shall have the same meaning as provided in §

46.2-100

.

History.

2010, c. 169.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 4.1-310.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 201, cl. 2.

History.

Former § 4.1–310, pertaining to illegal importation, shipment and transportation of alcoholic beverages; penalty; exception, derived from Code 1950, § 4-84; 1970, c. 297; 1978, c. 436; 1983, c. 212; 1984, c. 200; 1993, c. 866; 1994, c. 826; 1995, cc. 253, 317; 2003, cc. 1029, 1030; 2007, cc. 99, 799; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114; repealed by 2022, c. 201.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2022, c. 201, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act. The Board’s initial adoption of regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on such regulations prior to adoption.”

§ 4.1-310.1.
Delivery of wine or beer to retail licensee.

Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle or in Board regulation, no wine or beer may be shipped or delivered to a retail licensee for resale unless such wine or beer has first been (i) delivered to the licensed premises of a wine or beer wholesaler and unloaded, (ii) kept on the licensed premises of the wholesaler for not less than four hours prior to reloading on a vehicle, and (iii) recorded in the wholesaler’s inventory. Any holder of a restricted wholesale wine license issued pursuant to subdivision 3 of §

4.1-206.2

shall be exempt from the requirement set forth in clause (ii).

History.

2018, cc. 166, 167; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and substituted “subdivision 3 of §

4.1-206.2

” for “§

4.1-207.1

” in the second sentence.

§ 4.1-311.
Limitations on transporting lawfully purchased alcoholic beverages; penalty.

Except as otherwise permitted under subsection F of §

4.1-206.3

or §

4.1-209.1

or

4.1-212.1

, the transportation of alcoholic beverages is prohibited except in accordance with Board regulations and the following provisions:

Wine may be (i) if lawfully purchased in the Commonwealth for personal use and not for resale, transported within the Commonwealth in the personal possession of the purchaser; (ii) if lawfully purchased outside the Commonwealth for personal use and not for resale, transported into or within the Commonwealth in the personal possession of the purchaser in an amount not to exceed three gallons; or (iii) transported into the Commonwealth if consigned to a wholesale wine licensee.

Beer may be (i) if lawfully purchased in the Commonwealth for personal use and not for resale, transported within the Commonwealth in the personal possession of the purchaser; (ii) if lawfully purchased outside the Commonwealth for personal use and not for resale, transported into or within the Commonwealth in the personal possession of the purchaser in an amount not to exceed three gallons; or (iii) transported into the Commonwealth if consigned to a wholesale beer licensee.

Alcoholic beverages other than wine and beer may be (i) if lawfully purchased for personal use and not for resale, transported into or within the Commonwealth in the personal possession of the purchaser in an amount not to exceed three gallons or (ii) transported into the Commonwealth if such alcoholic beverages (a) are consigned to the Board, (b) are being transported to a distillery or winery licensee, or (c) are ordered by the Board and are being transported directly to persons for industrial purposes, persons for the manufacture of articles allowed to be manufactured under §

4.1-200

, or hospitals pursuant to a permit issued by the Board for which the Board may charge a reasonable fee.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit (i) any person from bringing, through U.S. Customs in his accompanying baggage, into the Commonwealth for personal use and not for resale alcoholic beverages in an amount not to exceed three gallons; (ii) the transportation into the Commonwealth of a reasonable quantity of alcoholic beverages for personal use and not for resale in the personal or household effects of a person relocating his place of residence to the Commonwealth; or (iii) the transportation of alcoholic beverages on passenger boats, dining cars, buffet cars, or club cars licensed under this subtitle or by common carriers engaged in interstate or foreign commerce.

Any person transporting alcoholic beverages in violation of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-72; 1974, c. 460, § 4-72.1; 1975, c. 480; 1978, c. 436; 1993, c. 866; 2022, c. 201.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, c. 201, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act. The Board's initial adoption of regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on such regulations prior to adoption.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 201 rewrote this section, which read: “The transportation of alcoholic beverages lawfully purchased in the Commonwealth in excess of the following limits is prohibited except in accordance with Board regulations: “1. Wine and beer, no limitation. “Alcoholic beverages other than wine and beer, three gallons, provided that not more than one gallon thereof shall be in containers holding less than one-fifth of a gallon. If any part of the alcoholic beverages being transported is held in metric-sized containers, the three-gallon limitation shall be construed to be 12 liters, and not more than 4 liters thereof shall be in containers smaller than 750 milliliters. “B. The transportation of alcoholic beverages lawfully purchased outside the Commonwealth, within, into or through the Commonwealth, in quantities in excess of one gallon or four liters if any part of the alcohol being transported is held in metric-sized containers, is prohibited except in accordance with Board regulations adopted pursuant to this section. “C. Any person transporting alcoholic beverages in violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.”

Law Review.

For a note, “Alcohol Direct Shipment Laws, the Commerce Clause, and the Twenty-First Amendment,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 353 (1999).

§ 4.1-312.
Limitation on carrying alcoholic beverages in motor vehicle transporting passengers for hire; penalty.

The transportation of alcoholic beverages in any motor vehicle which is being used, or is licensed, for the transportation of passengers for hire is prohibited, except when carried in the possession of a passenger who is being transported for compensation at the regular rate and fare charged other passengers.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-74; 1993, c. 866.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 4.1-313.
Possessing, transporting, etc., alcoholic beverages illegally acquired; penalty.

No person, other than a common carrier, shall have, possess, keep, carry, ship or transport alcoholic beverages upon which the tax imposed by the laws of the United States has not been paid.

No person shall possess alcoholic beverages in amounts in excess of the limits provided in §

4.1-311

in containers not bearing evidence that they have been purchased from the Board or a person licensed to sell them, or other evidence that the tax due to the Commonwealth or the markup required by the Board has been paid, unless it can be proved that the alcoholic beverages were lawfully acquired by the possessor.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-75; 1954, c. 484; 1966, c. 408; 1974, c. 460; 1975, c. 481; 1976, c. 36; 1984, c. 603; 1993, c. 866.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

As to prior conviction of illegal sale of liquor as bar to prosecution for illegal possession, see note to §

19.2-294

.

§ 4.1-314.
Keeping, possessing, or storing still or distilling apparatus without a permit; penalty.

No person shall keep, store, or have in his possession any still or distilling apparatus for the purpose of distilling alcohol without a permit from the Board.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-77; 1993, c. 866; 2020, c. 386.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 386 inserted “for the purpose of distilling alcohol” in the first paragraph and made stylistic changes.